Maine, session 132, LD828.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §6402-A, first ¶, as amended by PL 2013, c. 78, §1, is further
amended to read:
Each school board shall appoint one or more physicians or, family or pediatric nurse
practitioners or chiropractic doctors licensed under Title 32, chapter 9 to act as school
health advisor.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §6402-A, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2013, c. 78, §1, is further
amended to read:
3. Prohibition. A school health advisor may not treat any student examined under
this subchapter unless the school health advisor is also the student's personal health care
provider. A school health advisor that advises a school board pursuant to subsection 1 or
performs other functions under subsection 2 may not act outside the scope of practice of
the physician or, nurse practitioner or chiropractic doctor who functions as a school health
advisor as established by law or rule of the applicable licensing board.